parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/FRENCH/FST/src/flexions.xfst
# ============================================================================
# TYPE:		(x)fst script
# ENCODING:	UTF-8
# CONTENT:      inflectional endings
# 
# LANGUAGE:     FRENCH
#
# AUTHOR:       A. Rebotier, A. Schiller
#
# CREATED:	8-Mar-2006 (AS)
# UPADTED:	05-Apr-2006 (AS: changed to utf8)
#
# ============================================================================
# USAGE:        xfst -utf8 -l [ThisFile]
# ============================================================================


! --------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> additional entries

# suffixes for adjectives
define ADJ	[	  %+Masc:0 %+SG:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_SG:0 
		| 0:{e}  %+Fem:0  %+SG:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_SG:0 
		| 0:s	  %+Masc:0 %+PL:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_PL:0 
		| 0:{es} %+Fem:0  %+PL:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_PL:0 
		];

define ADJe	[	  %+InvGen:0 %+SG:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_SG:0 
		| 0:s	  %+InvGen:0 %+PL:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_PL:0 
		];

define ADJen	[	  %+Masc:0 %+SG:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_SG:0 
		| 0:{ne}  %+Fem:0  %+SG:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_SG:0 
		| 0:s	  %+Masc:0 %+PL:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_PL:0 
		| 0:{nes} %+Fem:0  %+PL:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_PL:0 
		];


define ADJREG	[   		%+Masc:0 %+SG:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_SG:0 
		| 0:{+e}  	%+Fem:0  %+SG:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_SG:0 
		| 0:{+s}	%+Masc:0 %+PL:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_PL:0 
		| 0:{+es} 	%+Fem:0  %+PL:0 %+Adj:0 %+ADJ%_PL:0 
		];

define NOUNMF	[   		%+Masc:0 %+SG:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_SG:0 
		| 0:{+e}  	%+Fem:0  %+SG:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_SG:0 
		| 0:{+s}	%+Masc:0 %+PL:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_PL:0 
		| 0:{+es} 	%+Fem:0  %+PL:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_PL:0 
		];




# suffixes for nouns
define NMASCSG	[ %+Masc:0 %+SG:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_SG:0 ];
define NMASCPL	[ %+Masc:0 %+PL:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_PL:0 ];

define NMASC   [	NMASCSG 
	       | 0:s	NMASCPL
	       ];

define NFEMSG [%+Fem:0 %+SG:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_SG:0 ];
define NFEMPL	[ %+Fem:0 %+PL:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_PL:0 ];


define NFEM   	[	NFEMSG 
	       	| 0:s	NFEMPL
	       	];


define PRENOMM	[ %+Masc:0 %+InvPL:0 %+PreN:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define PRENOMF	[ %+Fem:0 %+InvPL:0 %+PreN:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define PRENOM	[ %+InvPL:0 %+PreN:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];

define NOMPROPRE [ %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define NOMPROPREM [ %+Masc:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define NOMPROPREF [ %+Fem:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define VILLE [ %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+City:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define VILLEM [ %+Masc:0 %+InvPL:0 %+City:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define VILLEF [ %+Fem:0 %+InvPL:0 %+City:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define VILLEP [ %+InvGen:0 %+PL:0 %+City:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_PL:0];

define PAYS [ %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Country:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define PAYSF [ %+Fem:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Country:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define PAYSM [ %+Masc:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Country:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define REGION [ %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Region:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define REGIONF [ %+Fem:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Region:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define REGIONM [ %+Masc:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Region:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];

define ORG [ %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Org:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define ORGM [ %+Masc:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Org:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define ORGF [ %+Fem:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Org:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define ORGPL [ %+Masc:0 %+PL:0 %+Org:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_PL:0];

define ORGSPORT  [ %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Org:0 %+Sport:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define ORGSPORTM  [ %+Masc:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Org:0 %+Sport:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define ORGSPORTF  [ %+Fem:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Org:0 %+Sport:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define ORGSPORTPL [ %+Masc:0 %+PL:0 %+Org:0 %+Sport:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_PL:0];

define ORGMUS  [ %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Org:0 %+Musique:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define ORGMEDIA  [ %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Org:0 %+Media:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define ORGEDU  [ %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Org:0 %+Edu:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define ORGNONCOM [ %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Org:0 %+NonCom:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];

define FIRME [ %+InvGen:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Busi:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define FIRMEM [ %+Masc:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Busi:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define FIRMEF [ %+Fem:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Busi:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define FIRMEPL [ %+Masc:0 %PL:0 %+Busi:0 %+Proper:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_PL:0];

# CB

define TITREFINV [ %+Fem:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Tit:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define TITREF [ %+Fem:0 %+SG:0 %+Tit:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define TITREMINV [ %+Masc:0 %+InvPL:0 %+Tit:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];
define TITREM [ %+Masc:0 %+SG:0 %+Tit:0 %+Noun:0 %+NOUN%_INV:0];

# for usage in compound words:
define AFFIX	0:%^AFF ;

# morphophonological rules:
define RULE 	[
# copy endings (for compounds)
# social^AFF-démocrate+es	->	social+es-démocrate+es
# social^AFF-démocrate+s	->	social+s-démocrate+s
	%^AFF -> {+es}	|| _ %- ${+es}
.o.	%^AFF -> {+e}	|| _ %- ${+e}
.o.	%^AFF -> {+s}	|| _ %- ${+s}
.o.	%^AFF -> 0

# morphophonological changes
#  social+es-démocrate+es	-> sociales-démocrates
#  social+s-démocrate+s		-> sociaux-démocrates

.o.	{al+s} -> {aux}
.o.	{if+e}  -> {ive}
.o.	{e+e}  -> e
.o.	{eux+e} -> {euse}
.o.	{eux+s} -> {eux}
.o.	{ier+e} -> {ière}
.o.	%+ -> 0
.o.	[é|è] (->) e
.o.	ï (->) i
];
